California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Parties [872.510. - 872.550.]

872.510.

The plaintiff shall join as defendants in the action all persons having or claiming interests of record or actually known to the plaintiff or reasonably apparent from an inspection of the property, in the estate as to which partition is sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.520.

(a) If the name of a person described in Section 872.510 is not known to the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall so state in the complaint and shall name as parties all persons unknown in the manner provided in Section 872.550.

(b) If the ownership or the share or quantity of the interest of a person described in Section 872.510 is unknown, uncertain, or contingent, the plaintiff shall so state in the complaint. If the lack of knowledge, uncertainty, or contingency is caused by a transfer to an unborn or unascertained beneficiary or class member, or by a transfer in the form of a contingent remainder, vested remainder subject to defeasance, executory interest, or similar disposition, the plaintiff shall also state in the
 complaint, so far as is known to the plaintiff, the name, age, and legal disability (if any) of the person in being who would be entitled to ownership of the interest had the contingency upon which the right of such person depends occurred prior to the commencement of the action.

(c) The court shall upon its own motion or upon motion of any party make such orders for joinder of additional parties and for appointment of guardians ad litem pursuant to Sections 372, 373, and 373.5 as are necessary or proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 8.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

872.530.

(a) If a person described in Section 872.510 is dead and the plaintiff knows of a personal representative, the plaintiff shall join such personal representative as a defendant.

(b) If a person described in Section 872.510 is dead, or is believed by the plaintiff to be dead, and the plaintiff knows of no personal representative:

(1) The plaintiff shall state these facts in an affidavit filed with the complaint.

(2) Where it is stated in the affidavit that
such person is dead, the plaintiff may join as defendants “the testate and intestate successors of ____ (naming such deceased person), deceased, and all persons claiming by, through, or under said decedent,” naming them in that manner.

(3) Where it is stated in the affidavit that such person is believed to be dead, the plaintiff may join such person as a defendant, and he may also join “the testate and intestate successors of ____ (naming such person) believed to be deceased, and all persons claiming by, through, or under such person,” naming them in that manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.540.

Where property is subject to a lease, community lease, unit agreement, or other pooling arrangement with respect to oil or gas or both, the plaintiff need not join as defendants persons whose only interest in the property is that of a lessee, royalty-owner, lessor-owner of other real property in the community, unit, or pooled area, or working interest owner, or persons claiming under them, and the judgment shall not affect the interests of such persons not joined as defendants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.550.

Where partition is sought as to all interests in the property, the plaintiff may join as defendants “all persons unknown claiming any interest in the property,” naming them in that manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Trial [872.610. - 872.840.]



  ARTICLE 1. Determination of Interests of Parties [872.610. - 872.640.]

872.610.

The interests of the parties, plaintiff as well as defendant, may be put in issue, tried, and determined in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.620.

To the extent necessary to grant the relief sought or other appropriate relief, the court shall upon adequate proof ascertain the state of the title to the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.630.

(a) To the extent necessary to grant the relief sought or other appropriate relief, the court shall determine the status and priority of all liens upon the property.

(b) The court may appoint a referee to ascertain the facts necessary for the determination required by this section. Upon application of the referee or a lienholder, the court shall direct the issuance of process to compel attendance of witnesses, the production of books, documents, or things, and the filing of verified claims. The report of the referee thereon shall be made in writing to the court and shall be confirmed,
modified, or set aside and a new reference ordered, as the justice of the case may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.640.

Where two or more parties are unknown, the court may consider their interests together in the action and not as between each other.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Determination of Right to Partition [872.710. - 872.730.]

872.710.

(a) At the trial, the court shall determine whether the plaintiff has the right to partition.

(b) Except as provided in Section 872.730, partition as to concurrent interests in the property shall be as of right unless barred by a valid waiver.

(c) Partition as to successive estates in the property shall be allowed if it is in the best interest of all the parties. The court shall consider whether the possessory interest has become unduly burdensome by reason of taxes or other charges, expense of ordinary or extraordinary
repairs, character of the property and change in the character of the property since creation of the estates, circumstances under which the estates were created and change in the circumstances since creation of the estates, and all other factors that would be considered by a court of equity having in mind the intent of the creator of the successive estates and the interests and needs of the successive owners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.720.

(a) If the court finds that the plaintiff is entitled to partition, it shall make an interlocutory judgment that determines the interests of the parties in the property and orders the partition of the property and, unless it is to be later determined, the manner of partition.

(b) If the court determines that it is impracticable or highly inconvenient to make a single interlocutory judgment that determines, in the first instance, the interests of all the parties in the property, the court may first ascertain the interests of the original concurrent or successive owners and thereupon
make an interlocutory judgment as if such persons were the sole parties in interest and the only parties to the action. Thereafter, the court may proceed in like manner as between the original concurrent or successive owners and the parties claiming under them or may allow the interests to remain without further partition if the parties so desire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.730.

To the extent that the court determines that the provisions of this title are a suitable remedy, such provisions may be applied in a proceeding for partnership accounting and dissolution, or in an action for partition of partnership property, where the rights of unsecured creditors of the partnership will not be prejudiced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determination of Manner of Partition [872.810. - 872.840.]

872.810.

The court shall order that the property be divided among the parties in accordance with their interests in the property as determined in the interlocutory judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.820.

Notwithstanding Section 872.810, the court shall order that the property be sold and the proceeds be divided among the parties in accordance with their interests in the property as determined in the interlocutory judgment in the following situations:

(a) The parties agree to such relief, by their pleadings or otherwise.

(b) The court determines that, under the circumstances, sale and division of the proceeds would be more equitable than division of the property. For the purpose of making the determination, the court may appoint a referee and
take into account his report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.830.

If, in making a determination whether sale would be more equitable than division of the property, the court finds that sale and division of proceeds for part of the property would be more equitable than division of the whole property, the court may order that such part be sold and the remainder divided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

872.840.

(a) Where the property or an interest therein is subject to an express trust, the court may, in its discretion, order that the property be sold.

(b) Upon division or sale of such property, the property or proceeds of sale allotted to the trustee of the express trust shall be held by him upon the trust therein stated, and no further action by the court pursuant to Section 873.840 is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Referees [873.010. - 873.160.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [873.010. - 873.080.]

873.010.

(a) The court shall appoint a referee to divide or sell the property as ordered by the court.

(b) The court may:

(1) Determine whether a referee’s bond is necessary and fix the amount of the bond.

(2) Instruct the referee.

(3) Fix the reasonable compensation for the services of the referee and provide for payment of the referee’s reasonable expenses.

(4) Provide for the date of commencement of the lien of the referee allowed by law.

(5) Require the filing of interim or final accounts of the referee, settle the accounts of the referee, and discharge the referee.

(6) Remove the referee.

(7) Appoint a new referee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.020.

The court in its discretion may appoint a referee for sale and a referee for division, or may appoint a single referee for both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.030.

(a) The court may, with the consent of the parties, appoint three referees to divide or sell the property as ordered by the court.

(b) The three referees so appointed shall have all the powers and may perform all the duties required of one referee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.040.

(a) The court shall appoint as referee under this title any person or persons to whose appointment all parties have consented.

(b) In the case of a minor party or a party for whom a conservator of the estate has been appointed, the guardian or conservator of the estate of the party may so consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

873.050.

None of the following persons shall be appointed a referee under this title:

(a) A clerk or deputy clerk of the court.

(b) A former or present partner or employee of the judge.

(c) A relative within the third degree of the judge or the judge’s spouse or the spouse of such a relative.

(d) An owner of any interest in the property that is the subject of the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.060.

The referee may perform any acts necessary to exercise the authority conferred by this title or by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.070.

The referee or any party may, on noticed motion, petition the court for instructions concerning the referee’s duties under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.080.

(a) In selling or dividing the property, the referee may, if it will be for the advantage of those interested, designate a portion of the property as a public or private way, road, or street. In connection therewith, the referee may also recommend the closure of any or all other roads on the property and allocation of the portion of the property occupied by such roads to the parties. 

(b) Upon making such a designation and recommendation that is adequate to accommodate public and private needs, the referee shall report that fact to the court.

(c) Upon confirmation of the referee’s report by the court, subject to any necessary action by the appropriate public entities:

(1) The portion of the property designated as a public way, road, or street shall not be allocated to any of the parties or sold but shall be an open and public way, road, or street.

(2) The property designated as a private way, road, or street shall be a private way for the use of the parties interested.

(3) The roads recommended to be closed shall be deemed abandoned upon the terms stated in the order of confirmation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts of Referee [873.110. - 873.160.]

873.110.

Subject to the limitations of this article, the court may:

(a) Authorize or approve contracts of the referee for the services and expenses of surveyors, engineers, appraisers, attorneys, real estate brokers, auctioneers, and others.

(b) Allow and direct payment of or reject claims under such contracts.

(c) Provide for the date of commencement of any lien provided by law or contract for such claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.120.

(a) The referee may employ an attorney only with the approval of the court pursuant to Section 873.110.

(b) The application for approval shall be in writing and shall include the name of the attorney whom the referee wishes to employ and the necessity for the employment.

(c) The attorney so employed may not be attorney for, or associated with or employed by an attorney for, any party to the action except with the written consent of all the parties to the action.

(d) Any claim for compensation for the attorney shall detail the services performed by the attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.130.

The referee may, with the approval of the court pursuant to Section 873.110, employ a surveyor with the necessary assistants to aid in making a sale or division of property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.140.

The referee may, with the approval of the court pursuant to Section 873.110, employ an auctioneer, authorized to act as such in the locality, to conduct a public auction and to secure purchasers by such method for any property to be sold at public auction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.150.

A contract for the services of an attorney, surveyor, auctioneer, or other third person may provide for the accrual of interest at a rate not in excess of the legal rate for amounts due under the contract that are not paid within three months after the time they become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.160.

The referee is not personally liable on contracts made, or for expenses incurred, except as such liability is expressly assumed by the referee in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Division of the Property [873.210. - 873.290.]

873.210.

The referee appointed by the court to make a division of the property shall divide the property and allot the several portions to the parties, quality and quantity relatively considered, according to their interests in the property as determined in the interlocutory judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.220.

As far as practical, and to the extent it can be done without material injury to the rights of the other parties, the property shall be so divided as to allot to a party any portion that embraces improvements made by that party or that party’s predecessor in interest. In such division and allotment, the value of such improvements shall be excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.230.

Where prior to the commencement of the action a party has executed a deed purporting to convey to a purchaser a portion of the property to be divided, to the extent it can be done without material injury to the rights of the other parties, the property shall be so divided as to allot that portion to the purchaser, the purchaser’s heirs or assigns, or such other action taken as to make the deed effectual as a conveyance of that portion of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.240.

Where real property consists of more than one distinct lot or parcel, the property shall be divided by such lots or parcels without other internal division to the extent that it can be done without material injury to the rights of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.250.

(a) Where division cannot be made equally among the parties according to their interests without prejudice to the rights of some, compensation may be required to be made by one party to another to correct the inequality.

(b) No compensation shall be required to be made to others by unknown owners or by minors unless it appears that a minor has personal property sufficient for that purpose and the minor’s interest will be promoted thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.260.

Where a lien is on an undivided interest of a party, the lien shall, upon division of the property, become a charge only on the share allotted to that party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.270.

Where the court has determined the combined interests of two or more unknown parties, the entire portion of the property allocated to such parties shall remain undivided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.280.

(a) The referee shall file with the court a report of the referee’s proceedings and give written notice of filing to each party who has appeared in the action.

(b) The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A specification of the manner in which the referee has executed the referee’s trust.

(2) A description of the property divided and of the share allotted to each party, along with any recommendation as to owelty.

(3) Any recommendation as to opening and closing public and private ways, roads, streets, and easements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.290.

(a) Any party, upon notice to the other parties who have appeared, may move the court to confirm, modify, or set aside the report.

(b) At the hearing, the court may either confirm the report as filed or as the court may modify and enter judgment of partition accordingly or set aside the report and order preparation of a new report and, if necessary, appoint a new referee for this purpose.

(c) The division is effective and title vests in accordance therewith upon entry of judgment of partition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Sale of the Property [873.510. - 873.850.]



  ARTICLE 1. Manner of Sale [873.510. - 873.530.]

873.510.

The referee appointed by the court to make a sale of the property shall sell the property in the manner and following the procedures provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.520.

The property shall be sold at public auction or private sale as the court determines will be more beneficial to the parties. For the purpose of making this determination, the court may refer the matter to the referee and take into account the referee’s report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.530.

Part of the property may be sold at public auction and part at private sale if it appears that to do so will be more beneficial to the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sales Procedures [873.600. - 873.690.]

873.600.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the court shall order sale by such methods and upon such terms as are expressly agreed to in writing by all the parties to the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.610.

(a) The court may, at the time of trial or thereafter, prescribe such manner, terms, and conditions of sale not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter as it deems proper for the particular property or sale.

(b) The court may refer the manner, terms, and conditions of sale to the referee for recommendation but shall not approve the referee’s report except following a hearing upon noticed motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.620.

(a) Unless the interests and rights of the parties will be materially prejudiced thereby, the court shall order that distinct lots or parcels of real property be sold separately.

(b) The court may order that the real and personal property or any portion thereof be sold as a unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.630.

The court may:

(a) Direct a sale on credit for the property or any part thereof.

(b) Prescribe such terms of credit as may be appropriate.

(c) Approve or prescribe the terms of security to be taken upon the sale, including the manner in which title to the security is to be taken, whether in a single instrument or several instruments, according to the interests of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.640.

(a) Notice of the sale of real or personal property shall be given in the manner required for notice of sale of like property upon execution. Such notice shall also be given to every party who has appeared in the action and to such other interested persons as may have in writing requested the referee for special notice.

(b) Where real and personal property are to be sold as a unit, notice of the sale may be in the manner required for notice of sale of real property alone.

(c) The court may order such additional notice as
it deems proper.

(d) Where the court orders a new sale of property pursuant to Section 873.730 or Section 873.740, notice of sale shall be as provided in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.650.

(a) The court shall prescribe the contents of the notice of sale, which shall include a description of the property, the time and place of sale, and a statement of the principal terms of sale. In place of the principal terms of sale, the notice may refer to an order of the court or to a written statement containing such information which may be inspected at the place of business of the referee or the referee’s attorney.

(b) A notice of private sale shall state a place where bids or offers will be received and a day on or after which the sale will be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.660.

(a) The court may order securities listed on an established stock or bond exchange, and personal property that is perishable, that will depreciate in value if not promptly disposed of, or that will incur loss or expense by being kept, to be sold upon such notice and conditions as may be appropriate.

(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, title to property sold pursuant to this section passes without court confirmation. The referee is responsible for the actual value of the property until, after return and proper showing, the court approves the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.670.

(a) A sale at public auction to the highest bidder shall be held in the county in which the action is pending or such other place as may be specified by the court.

(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, personal property shall be present at the sale.

(c) The sale may be postponed by the referee by public declaration as provided for sales upon execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.680.

(a) A sale at private sale shall not be made before the day specified in the notice of sale but shall be made within one year thereafter.

(b) The bids or offers shall be in writing and left at the place designated in the notice at any time after the first publication or, if none, the posting of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.690.

(a) The following persons shall not purchase property sold in the action directly or indirectly:

(1) The referee.

(2) The attorney of a party.

(3) The guardian or conservator of a party, unless for the benefit of the ward or conservatee.

(b) All sales contrary to this section are void except that a sale to a bona fide purchaser following a sale contrary to this section shall not be
disturbed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Consummation of Sale [873.710. - 873.790.]

873.710.

(a) Upon making a sale of property, the referee shall report the sale to the court.

(b) The referee’s report shall contain, in addition to such other information as may be appropriate, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the property sold to each purchaser.

(2) The name of the purchaser.

(3) The sale price.

(4) The terms and conditions of the sale and the security, if any, taken.

(5) Any amounts payable to lienholders.

(6) A statement as to contractual or other arrangements or conditions as to agents’ commissions.

(7) Any determination and recommendation as to opening and closing public and private ways, roads, streets, and easements.

(8) Other material facts relevant to the sale and the confirmation proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.720.

(a) A purchaser, the referee, or any party may move the court to confirm or set aside the sale.

(b) The moving party shall give not less than 10 days’ notice of motion to:

(1) The purchaser if the purchaser is not the moving party; and

(2) All other parties who have appeared in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.730.

(a) At the hearing, the court shall examine the report and witnesses in relation to the report.

(b) The court may confirm the sale notwithstanding a variance from the prescribed terms of sale if to do so will be beneficial to the parties and will not result in substantial prejudice to persons interested in the sale.

(c) The court may vacate the sale and direct that a new sale be made if it determines any of the following:

(1) The proceedings were unfair or
notice of sale was not properly given. If there is no finding at the hearing of unfairness or improper notice, the sale may thereafter not be attacked on such grounds.

(2) The sale price is disproportionate to the value of the property.

(3) It appears that a new sale will yield a sum that exceeds the sale price by at least 10 percent on the first ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and 5 percent on the amount in excess thereof, determined after a reasonable allowance for the expenses of a new sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.740.

(a) If at the hearing under Section 873.730 a responsible bidder makes a written increased offer that exceeds the sale price by at least 10 percent on the first ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and 5 percent on the amount in excess thereof, the court in its discretion may do either of the following:

(1) Vacate the sale and direct that a new sale be made.

(2) Vacate the sale, accept the increased offer, and confirm the sale to the offerer.

(b) Except as
provided in subdivision (c), the amount by which an increased offer exceeds the sale price is determined on the basis of the gross amount of the increased offer including any commission on the increased offer to which an agent may be entitled.

(c) Where in advance of sale the court has so ordered or the parties have so agreed, if an increased offer is made by a party to the action who is not represented by an agent, the amount by which an increased offer of a nonparty exceeds the sale price is determined on the basis of the net amount of the increased offer excluding any commission on the increased offer to which an agent may be entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.745.

The amount of agents’ commissions on the sale, if any, shall be fixed by the court and divided or limited in the manner provided for private sales of real property in decedents’ estates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.750.

(a) Upon confirmation of a sale, the court shall order the referee to execute a conveyance or other instrument of transfer, to collect the proceeds, take security, and perform other acts required to consummate the sale.

(b) The order may direct the referee concerning the distribution, deposit, or securing of sale deposits and sale proceeds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.760.

If the purchaser, after the confirmation of the sale, fails to pay the sale price, the purchaser is subject to the court’s jurisdiction and to further proceedings in the action. Upon such failure, a party, or the referee, may upon notice move the court to order either of the following forms of relief:

(a) Resale of the property upon notice as provided in this chapter. If any loss is occasioned thereby, the referee may recover the amount of such loss and costs and expenses incurred, including a reasonable attorney’s fee, from the purchaser who failed to pay.

(b) Maintenance by the referee of an action against the purchaser for the amount of the sale price. If the referee recovers judgment, the referee shall be awarded a reasonable attorney’s fee against the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.770.

Where the purchaser is a party or lienholder entitled to a share of the proceeds of sale, the referee may:

(a) Take the purchaser’s receipt for so much of the proceeds of sale as belongs to the purchaser.

(b) Take security, or other arrangement satisfactory to the referee, for payment of amounts which are or may become due from the purchaser on account of the expenses of sale, general costs of the action, and costs of the reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.780.

The court may make orders relating to the closing of a sale after confirmation, including escrow and closing provisions and, if the referee and purchaser so agree and the court upon noticed motion determines it will not result in substantial prejudice to the parties, may make adjustments varying the terms of sale based on after-discovered defects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.790.

(a) Upon fulfillment of the terms of sale, the referee shall execute a conveyance or other instrument of transfer to the purchaser.

(b) The conveyance or transfer of real property and the order authorizing such conveyance or transfer shall be recorded in each county in which the property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposition of Proceeds of Sale [873.810. - 873.850.]

873.810.

The court shall order the proceeds of sale and any security therefor to be paid, transferred, deposited in court, placed in trust, or invested in State of California or United States government obligations or interest-bearing accounts in an institution whose accounts are insured by an agency of the federal government, to or for the benefit of the persons in interest entitled thereto, as may be appropriate or as specifically provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.820.

The proceeds of sale for any property sold shall be applied in the following order:

(a) Payment of the expenses of sale.

(b) Payment of the other costs of partition in whole or in part or to secure any cost of partition later allowed.

(c) Payment of any liens on the property in their order of priority except liens which under the terms of sale are to remain on the property.

(d) Distribution of the residue among the
parties in proportion to their shares as determined by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.830.

Where a part only of the property is sold, a tenant for life or years in an undivided share of the whole property may have his estate equitably set off in any part of the property not sold by way of complete or partial satisfaction of his share of the proceeds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.840.

(a) The court shall ascertain the proportion of the proceeds of sale that will be a just and reasonable sum for the satisfaction of the estate of a tenant for life or years and shall order such amount distributed to him or held for his benefit.

(b) The court shall ascertain the proportional value of any vested or contingent future right or estate in the property and shall direct such proportion of the proceeds of sale to be distributed, secured, or held in such a manner as to protect the rights and interests of the parties.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, in the case of an estate for life or defeasible estate with remainder over, the court may direct that the entire proceeds of sale be placed in trust as provided in this section upon a showing that the establishment of such a trust is economically feasible and will serve the best interests of the parties. The court shall appoint a trustee, upon security satisfactory to the court, who under court supervision shall invest and reinvest the proceeds, pay the income of the investments, if any, to the life tenant or owner of the defeasible interest, and upon termination of the life or defeasible estate, deliver or pay the corpus of the trust estate to the remainderman. The court shall retain jurisdiction over the settlement of the accounts of the trustee and in all matters necessary for the proper administration of the trust and the final distribution of the trust fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.850.

When the proceeds of the sale belonging to persons who are parties to the action, whether known or unknown, have not been allocated among such parties, the action may be continued as between such parties, for the determination of their respective claims thereto, which must be ascertained and adjudged by the court. Further testimony may be taken in court, or by a referee, at the discretion of the court, and the court may, if necessary, require such parties to present the facts or law in controversy, by pleadings, as in an original action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Partition by Appraisal [873.910. - 873.980.]

873.910.

When the interests of all parties are undisputed or have been adjudicated, the parties may agree upon a partition by appraisal pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.920.

The agreement shall be in writing filed with the clerk of court and shall include:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) The names of the parties and their interests.

(c) The names of the parties who are willing to acquire the interests.

(d) The name or names of a person or persons to whose appointment as referee or referees the parties consent.

(e) The date or dates as of which the interests to be acquired are to be appraised.

(f) Other terms mutually agreed upon which may include, but are not limited to, provisions relating to abandonment of the action if the appraised value of the interest to be acquired exceeds a stated amount, required deposits on account of purchase price, terms of any credit, title and objections to title, and payment of the expenses of the procedure authorized by this chapter and of costs of the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.930.

(a) Any party to the agreement may, upon noticed motion, apply to the court for approval of the agreement.

(b) If the court determines that the agreement complies with Section 873.920 and that the terms and conditions are equitable, it shall approve the agreement and stay any pending division or sale of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.940.

The court shall appoint one referee or, if provided in the agreement, three referees to appraise the property and the interests involved. The referee shall report the valuations and other findings to the court in writing filed with the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.950.

Any party to the agreement or the referee, upon 10 days’ notice to the referee if the referee is not the moving party and to the other parties to the agreement, may move the court to confirm, modify, or set aside the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.960.

At the hearing, the court shall examine the report and witnesses. If the court determines that the proceedings have been regularly conducted, that transfer of title to the interests may regularly be made, and that no facts appear which would make such transfer inequitable, it shall confirm the report and order the interests transferred to the acquiring parties in proportion to their respective interests, or in such other proportion as is set out in the agreement. The order shall be conditioned upon payment of the amounts fixed as the purchase price and any other amounts required by the agreement, the giving of any required security, and payment by the parties of the